apertium-lat.lat.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
  Latin morphological analyser for Apertium

  Resources for Latin are bountiful...
  much of this lexicon was imported from AFGL's Latin lexicon
  http://www.agfl.cs.ru.nl/lat/generating.html

 # Latin grammar and lexicon constructed by
 # Cornelis H.A. Koster for Tineke E.Koster
 # as part of the AGFL project
 # C.H.A. Koster, dec 2003

#   This grammar is free software; you can use it, redistribute it
#   and/or modify it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public
#   License as published by the Free Software Foundation; either
#   version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#   This grammar is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the GNU
#   Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#   You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#   License along with this library; if not, write to the Free Software
#   Foundation, Inc., 59 Temple Place, Suite 330, Boston, MA 02111-1307 USA

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzŀlāēīōū</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>

    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="abl"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>

    <sdef n="pers"/>
    <sdef n="poss"/>
    <sdef n="refl"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>

    <sdef n="num"/>

    <sdef n="unknown"/>


    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>

    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>

    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>

    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>

    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>

    <sdef n="adj"/>

    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="ftp"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="impf"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="infp"/>
    <sdef n="pmp"/>
    <sdef n="pms"/>
    <sdef n="pfs"/>
    <sdef n="pfut"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="act"/>
    <sdef n="psv"/>

    <sdef n="sp"/>

    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>

    <sdef n="qnt"/>

    <sdef n="ij"/>

    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>

    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Adjectives -->
    <pardef n="alt/us__adj">
        <e><p><l>us</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>um</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ī</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ō</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ō</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ī</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ī</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ōs</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ōrum</l>            <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>am</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ae</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ae</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ā</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ae</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ae</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ās</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ārum</l>            <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>um</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>um</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>um</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ī</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ō</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ō</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ōrum</l>            <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="beatissimus"><i>beatissim</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "acidus" ><i>acid</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "aequaevus" ><i>aequaev</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "alarius" ><i>alari</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "ambitiosus" ><i>ambitios</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "annuus" ><i>annu</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "arctous" ><i>arcto</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "astrictus" ><i>astrict</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "auricomus" ><i>auricom</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "balnearius" ><i>balneari</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "bifurcus" ><i>bifurc</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "caerulus" ><i>caerul</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "caprigenus" ><i>caprigen</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "cavus" ><i>cav</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "chronicus" ><i>chronic</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "coacticius" ><i>coactici</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "commotus" ><i>commot</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "conscius" ><i>consci</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "convexus" ><i>convex</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "crispus" ><i>crisp</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "cycladatus" ><i>cycladat</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "dentatus" ><i>dentat</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "dignitosus" ><i>dignitos</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "dividuus" ><i>dividu</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "ebriosus" ><i>ebrios</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "electus" ><i>elect</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "excitatus" ><i>excitat</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "extraordinarius" ><i>extraordinari</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "fatuus" ><i>fatu</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "festus" ><i>fest</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "flumineus" ><i>flumine</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "frivolus" ><i>frivol</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "furtivus" ><i>furtiv</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "genetivus" ><i>genetiv</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "hamatus" ><i>hamat</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "hiulcus" ><i>hiulc</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "idolothytus" ><i>idolothyt</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "immediatus" ><i>immediat</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "imperiosus" ><i>imperios</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "imulus" ><i>imul</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "incitus" ><i>incit</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "incustoditus" ><i>incustodit</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "infacundus" ><i>infacund</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "infrenus" ><i>infren</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "iniurosus" ><i>iniuros</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "intempestivus" ><i>intempestiv</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "irrequietus" ><i>irrequiet</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "latebrosus" ><i>latebros</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "longius" ><i>longi</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "maiestus" ><i>maiest</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "meretricius" ><i>meretrici</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "mortuus" ><i>mortu</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "nesapius" ><i>nesapi</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "obscenus" ><i>obscen</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "oppositus" ><i>opposit</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "paternus" ><i>patern</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "perlaetus" ><i>perlaet</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pilatus" ><i>pilat</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "postremus" ><i>postrem</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "primogenitus" ><i>primogenit</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "publicus" ><i>public</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "rameus" ><i>rame</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "riguus" ><i>rigu</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "saplutus" ><i>saplut</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "semimortuus" ><i>semimortu</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "sincerus" ><i>sincer</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "squamosus" ><i>squamos</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "summissus" ><i>summiss</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "tenebrosus" ><i>tenebros</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "tribunicius" ><i>tribunici</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "umbrosus" ><i>umbros</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "venetus" ><i>venet</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "virgatus" ><i>virgat</i><par n="alt/us__adj"/></e>
